Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 3. Department of Health and State Health Commissioner.
§ 32.1-23.4.
Prescription drug price transparency; civil penalty.

As used in this section, “nonprofit data services organization” means the nonprofit organization with which the Commissioner has negotiated and entered into a contract or agreement for the compilation, storage, analysis, and evaluation of data submitted by health care providers pursuant to §

32.1-276.4

.

The Department shall negotiate and enter into a contract or agreement with a nonprofit data services organization to annually collect, compile, and make available on its website publicly available information about prescription drug prices submitted by health carriers and pharmacy benefits managers pursuant to §

38.2-3407.15:6

, wholesale distributors pursuant to § 54.1-3436.1, and manufacturers pursuant to § 54.1-3442.02. Such data and information shall be made available in aggregate in a form and manner that does not disclose or tend to disclose proprietary or confidential information of any health carrier, pharmacy benefits manager, wholesale distributor, or manufacturer.

A health carrier, pharmacy benefits manager, wholesale distributor, or manufacturer that fails to report information required to be reported pursuant to this section or §

38.2-3407.15:6

, 54.1-3436.1, or 54.1-3442.02, respectively, shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $2,500 per day from the date on which such reporting is required, to be collected by the Commissioner and deposited into the Literary Fund. However, the Commissioner may reduce or waive a civil penalty imposed pursuant to this section if he determines that the violation was reasonable or resulting from good cause.

The Department shall adopt regulations to implement the provisions of this section, which shall include (i) provisions related to the specification of prescription drugs for the purpose of data collection and procedures for auditing information provided by health carriers, pharmacy benefits managers, wholesale distributors, and manufacturers and (ii) a schedule of civil penalties for failure to report information required pursuant to this section or §

38.2-3407.15:6

, 54.1-3436.1, or 54.1-3442.02, which shall be based on the level of severity of the violation.

All information submitted by a health carrier or pharmacy benefits manager pursuant to §

38.2-3407.15:6

, a wholesale distributor pursuant to § 54.1-3436.1, or a manufacturer pursuant to § 54.1-3442.02 shall be confidential and exempt from disclosure under the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.), except to the extent that such information is included in an aggregated form in the report required pursuant to this section.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 304.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2021, Sp. Sess. I, act having been §

32.1-23.3

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 304, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 304, cl. 3 provides: “That the Department of Health shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

§ 32.1-23.5.
Reporting of certain data regarding financial assistance.

The Commissioner shall report annually by November 1 to the Chairmen of the House Committees on Appropriations and Health, Welfare and Institutions and the Senate Committees on Finance and Appropriations and Education and Health regarding data collected pursuant to subsection F of §

32.1-276.5

, including the value of (i) the amount of charity care, discounted care, or other financial assistance provided by each hospital under its financial assistance policy that is required to be reported in accordance with subsection F of §

32.1-276.5

and (ii) the amount of uncollected bad debt, including any uncollected bad debt from payment plans entered into in accordance with subsection C of §

32.1-137.09

.

History.

2022, cc. 679, 678.

§ 32.1-23.6.
Information and data related to social determinants of health.

As used in this section:

“Demographic data”
means data and information regarding the race, ethnicity, age, and gender of residents of the Commonwealth.

“Social determinants of health”
means conditions that affect health risks and health outcomes, including health care access and quality, education access and quality, social and community context, economic stability, and neighborhood and built environment.

The Department shall (i) collect and analyze information regarding demographics and the social determinants of health and their impacts on health and health risks of residents of the Commonwealth and (ii) make such information and analyses available to the public on its website. Nothing in this section shall allow for the release of personal health information or any other confidential information.

History.

2022, c. 750.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2022 act having been §

32.1-23.5

.